Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 1 DEFINITIONS AND GENERAL PROVISIONS
1-1-106. Computation of time.

Calendar days shall be used in all computations of time made under the provisions of this code.

In computing any period of days prescribed by this code, the day of the act or event from which the designated period of days begins to run shall not be included and the last day shall be included. Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays shall be included, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

If a number of months is to be computed by counting the months from a particular day, the period shall end on the same numerical day in the concluding month as the day of the month from which the computation is begun; except that, if there are not that many days in the concluding month, the counting period shall end on the last day of the concluding month.

If the last day for any act to be done or the last day of any period is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday and completion of such act involves a filing or other action during business hours, the period is extended to include the next day which is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

If the state constitution or a state statute requires doing an act in "not less than" or "no later than" or "at least" a certain number of days or "prior to" a certain number of days or a certain number of months "before" the date of an election, or any phrase that suggests a similar meaning, the period is shortened to and ends on the prior business day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, except as provided in section 1-2-201 (3).

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 631, § 1, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(5) amended, p. 1395, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2) and (5) amended, p. 820, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(5) amended, p. 1773, § 76, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(4) and (5) amended, p. 756, § 2, effective May 20.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-1-105 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For computation of time under the statutes generally, see § 2-4-108.

1-1-107. Powers and duties of secretary of state - penalty.

In addition to any other duties prescribed by law, the secretary of state has the following duties:

To supervise the conduct of primary, general, congressional vacancy, and statewide ballot issue elections in this state;

To enforce the provisions of this code;

With the assistance and advice of the attorney general, to make uniform interpretations of this code;

To coordinate the responsibilities of the state of Colorado under the federal "National Voter Registration Act of 1993", 52 U.S.C. sec. 20501 et seq.;

To serve as the chief state election official within the meaning of the federal "Help America Vote Act of 2002", 52 U.S.C. 20901 et seq., and, in that capacity, to coordinate the responsibilities of the state of Colorado under the federal act in accordance with the requirements of this code.

In addition to any other powers prescribed by law, the secretary of state has the following powers:

To promulgate, publish, and distribute, either in conjunction with copies of the election laws pursuant to section 1-1-108 or separately, such rules as the secretary of state finds necessary for the proper administration and enforcement of the election laws, including but not limited to rules establishing the amount of fees as provided in this code;

To inspect, with or without the filing of a complaint by any person, and review the practices and procedures of county clerk and recorders, their employees, and other election officials in the conduct of primary, general, and congressional vacancy elections and the registration of electors in this state;

To employ, subject to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution, the personnel deemed necessary to efficiently carry out the powers and duties prescribed in this code;

To enforce the provisions of this code by injunctive action brought by the attorney general in the district court for the judicial district in which any violation occurs. Upon an enforcement action being brought pursuant to this subsection (2)(d), the court shall expedite scheduling and the issuance of any orders such that a final ruling is made within thirty days of the action being filed. The court may continue the action beyond thirty days upon the motion of any party and upon a showing of good cause. The district court proceedings may be reviewed and finally adjudicated by the supreme court of this state if either party makes application to the supreme court within three days after the district court proceedings are terminated, unless the supreme court, in its discretion, declines jurisdiction of the case. The supreme court shall expedite scheduling and the issuance of any orders such that a final ruling is made within fourteen days of an appeal being filed. If the supreme court declines to review the proceedings, the decision of the district court is final and not subject to further appellate review.

Repealed.

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the office of the secretary of state, or the section or division administering the election laws of this state pursuant to this section, shall be open and available to the election officials and employees of the various political subdivisions conducting elections on each election day during the same hours that the polls are open for voting if the political subdivision has notified the office of the secretary of state that an election has been called and that the services of the office are desired.

The provisions of this section are enacted, pursuant to section 11 of article VII of the state constitution, to secure the purity of elections and to guard against the abuses of the elective franchise.

Repealed.

No person while serving in the office of secretary of state shall serve as the highest ranking official, whether actual or honorary, in the campaign of any candidate for federal or statewide office. This subsection (7) shall not apply to a campaign in which the secretary of state is the candidate.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 632, § 1, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1395, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1)(d) added, p. 1751, § 2, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(6) added, p. 179, § 1, effective April 7.

L. 96:

(3) repealed, p. 1775, § 84, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1317, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 2001:

(6) amended, p. 518, § 6, effective January 1, 2002.

L. 2003:

(1)(e) added and (6) repealed, p. 2065, §§ 2, 3, effective May 22.

L. 2005:

(7) added, p. 1393, § 2, effective June 6; (7) added, p. 1428, § 2, effective June 6.

L. 2016:

(1)(d), (1)(e), IP(2), and (2)(b) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 566, § 2, effective May 18; (1)(d) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 753, § 2, effective June 6.

L. 2022:

(2)(d) amended, (SB 22-153), ch. 322, p. 2277, § 4, effective June 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-1-106 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Colorado Election Security Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 22-153, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 322, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

1-1-108. Copies of election laws and manual provided.

No later than sixty days after each adjournment of the general assembly, the secretary of state shall transmit to the county clerk and recorder of each county a complete, updated copy of the pertinent sections of the election laws of the state.

No later than January 15 in even-numbered years, the division of local government in the department of local affairs shall transmit to the designated election official of each special district organized under article 1 of title 32, C.R.S., entitled to hold elections or, if there is no designated election official, to the chief executive officer of the special district, at least one copy of the election laws. The designated election officials or chief executive officers of those special districts may request additional copies of the election laws.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 633, § 1, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1395, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 820, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1733, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 757, § 3, effective May 20.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-1-107 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-1-109. Forms prescribed - rules.

Except as otherwise provided by this code, the secretary of state shall approve all forms required by this code, which forms shall be followed by county clerk and recorders, election judges, and other election officials. Prior to approving any election form, the secretary shall determine and consider best practices in the design and development of the form in order to minimize voter confusion and maximize ease of use.

A registered elector shall make elector registration information changes on an approved form, and the elector registration information changes must be entered on the elector's registration record and retained and stored in the statewide voter registration system.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., as may be necessary to administer and enforce any requirement of this section, including any rules necessary to specify what constitutes approved and acceptable forms certified for use by eligible voters, campaigns, and voter registration drives and acceptance by election officials and any rules necessary to establish uniformity regarding the use of forms.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 633, § 1, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 1733, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2065, § 4, effective May 22.

L. 2009:

(1) amended and (3) added, (HB 09-1336), ch. 261, p. 1198, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(2) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 566, § 3, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-1-108 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-1-110. Powers of county clerk and recorder and deputy - communication to electors.

The county clerk and recorder, in rendering decisions and interpretations under this code, shall consult with the secretary of state and follow the rules and orders promulgated by the secretary of state pursuant to this code.

(1.5) Pursuant to section 24-4-106 (4.7), C.R.S., a county clerk and recorder is authorized to seek judicial review of final action undertaken by the secretary of state arising under this code.

All powers and authority granted to the county clerk and recorder by this code may be exercised by a deputy clerk in the absence of the county clerk and recorder or if the county clerk and recorder for any reason is unable to perform the required duties.

As the chief election official for the county, the county clerk and recorder shall be the chief designated election official for all coordinated elections.

Except as otherwise provided in section 1-2-302.5, any communication by mail from the county clerk and recorder to any registered elector pursuant to this title must be sent to the elector's address of record.

Repealed.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (5) and notwithstanding any other provision of law, an elector may request to receive elections communication, except for ballots, confirmation cards, or correspondence sent in accordance with section 1-2-302.5 or 1-2-509 (3), from his or her county clerk and recorder by electronic transmission. With the request, the elector must submit an electronic-mail address to which the county clerk and recorder may send communication from the county clerk and recorder. The county clerk and recorder, upon receiving the request, may send all future elections communication, except for ballots, confirmation cards, or correspondence sent in accordance with section 1-2-302.5 or 1-2-509 (3), by electronic transmission to the electronic-mail address provided by the elector; except that:

If an elector subsequently requests to cease the electronic transmission and requests to receive future elections communication by mail, the county clerk and recorder shall comply with the request; or

If the county clerk and recorder, after sending such an electronic transmission, receives an undeliverable message or any other message indicating that the elector's electronic-mail address is no longer valid, the county clerk and recorder must send that particular communication by regular mail and shall not send any future elections communication by electronic transmission, unless the elector reapplies for electronic communications.

An electronic-mail address provided by an elector shall not be made available to the public or any individual or organization other than an authorized agent of the local election official, and is exempt from disclosure under article 72 of title 24, C.R.S. The address may be used only for official communication with the elector about the voting process, if the elector has requested such electronic transmission under this subsection (5).

All correspondence sent to an elector pursuant to this subsection (5) shall be maintained in the elector's registration records stored in the statewide voter registration system created in section 1-2-301; except that any undeliverable message or any other message indicating that the elector's electronic-mail address is no longer valid as described in subsection (5)(a)(II) of this section does not need to be stored in the statewide voter registration system.

The failure of an elector to receive elections communication by electronic transmission is not grounds to invalidate an election if the county clerk and recorder acted in good faith in making the electronic transmission.

Nothing in paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) prevents the receipt or return of a ballot via electronic transfer as set forth in section 1-7.5-115.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 634, § 1, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(3) amended, p. 1396, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(3) amended, p. 1734, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(4) added, p. 279, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2065, § 5, effective May 22.

L. 2012:

(4)(a) amended and (4)(b) repealed, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 676, § 2, effective May 17.

L. 2013:

(4)(a) amended and (4)(c) and (5) added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 683, § 4, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

(1.5) added, (HB 14-1354), ch. 159, p. 553, § 1, effective May 9.

L. 2016:

(4)(a) and IP(5)(a) amended and (4)(c) repealed, (HB 16-1093), ch. 126, p. 358, § 2, effective April 21.

L. 2018:

(5)(c) amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1603, § 1, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-1-109 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsection (4)(a) was amended and subsections (4)(c) and (5) were added by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-1-111. Powers and duties of governing boards.

In addition to any other duties prescribed by law, the governing board of a political subdivision entitled to call elections shall have the following duties:

To supervise the conduct of regular and special elections which it is authorized or required to call; and

Where appropriate, to consult and coordinate with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the political subdivision is located and with the secretary of state in regard to conducting elections and rendering decisions and interpretations under this code.

All powers and authority granted to the governing board of a political subdivision may be exercised by an election official designated by the board. The governing body may also contract with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the political subdivision is organized to perform all or part of the required duties in conducting the election.

Elections which are set for the same date by various political subdivisions may be held as coordinated elections if the governing bodies so choose. Political subdivisions are authorized to cooperate and contract with each other to perform any function relating to an election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 634, § 1, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(3) amended, p. 1396, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 1150, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(3) amended, p. 1734, § 6, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For violation of duty and penalty therefor, see § 1-13-107.

1-1-112. Powers and duties of election commission. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 635, § 1, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2016:

Entire section repealed, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 593, § 82, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-1-110 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-1-113. Neglect of duty and wrongful acts - procedures for adjudication of controversies - review by supreme court.

When any controversy arises between any official charged with any duty or function under this code and any candidate, or any officers or representatives of a political party, or any persons who have made nominations or when any eligible elector files a verified petition in a district court of competent jurisdiction alleging that a person charged with a duty under this code has committed or is about to commit a breach or neglect of duty or other wrongful act, after notice to the official which includes an opportunity to be heard, upon a finding of good cause, the district court shall issue an order requiring substantial compliance with the provisions of this code. The order shall require the person charged to forthwith perform the duty or to desist from the wrongful act or to forthwith show cause why the order should not be obeyed. The burden of proof is on the petitioner.

Repealed.

The proceedings may be reviewed and finally adjudicated by the supreme court of this state, if either party makes application to the supreme court within three days after the district court proceedings are terminated, unless the supreme court, in its discretion, declines jurisdiction of the case. If the supreme court declines to review the proceedings, the decision of the district court shall be final and not subject to further appellate review.

Except as otherwise provided in this part 1, the procedure specified in this section shall be the exclusive method for the adjudication of controversies arising from a breach or neglect of duty or other wrongful act that occurs prior to the day of an election.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the procedures specified in section 1-1.5-105 shall constitute the exclusive administrative remedy for a complaint arising under Title III of the federal "Help America Vote Act of 2002", Pub.L. 107-252.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 635, § 1, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1396, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(2) amended and (4) added, p. 1151, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(5) added, p. 2065, § 6, effective May 22.

L. 2007:

(3) amended, p. 1968, § 3, effective August 3.

L. 2010:

(2) repealed, (HB 10-1291), ch. 325, p. 1506, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-1-111 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

(1) For violation of duty and penalty therefor, see § 1-13-107.

(2) For the "Help America Vote Act of 2002", see Pub.L. 107-252, codified at 42 U.S.C. sec. 15301 et seq.

1-1-114. Registration deadline. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 635, § 1, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1396, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1751, § 3, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 820, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1775, § 84, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was relocated to § 1-2-201 (3) in 1996.

1-1-115. Colorado voter access and modernized elections commission - creation - composition - terms - duties - report - definition - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 684, § 5, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

(3)(b)(III) amended, (SB 14-153), ch. 390, p. 1960, § 2, effective June 6.

Editor's note:

Subsection (8) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2015. (See L. 2013, p. 684.)